Washington statutes.
RCW 28C.18.068

Policies to accommodate student absences for reasons of faith or conscience or for activities conducted under the auspices of a religious organization.

State-funded workforce training programs must develop policies to accommodate student absences for up to two days per academic year, to allow students to take holidays for reasons of faith or conscience or for organized activities conducted under the auspices of a religious denomination, church, or religious organization, so that students' grades are not adversely impacted by the absences.

[ 2014 c 168 s 5.]